Idaho, session 2026, H0734.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 63-3503B, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3503B. FILING OPERATORS' STATEMENTS -- ALLOTMENT AND APPORTION-
MENT OF TAX DUE FROM PRODUCERS OF ELECTRICITY BY MEANS OF WIND ENERGY, SOLAR
ENERGY, OR GEOTHERMAL ENERGY BY STATE TAX COMMISSION. (1) Every producer of
electricity by means of wind energy, by means of solar energy, or by means
of geothermal energy in this state shall file with the state tax commission
of the state of Idaho an operator's statement in the manner as provided for
in section 63-404, Idaho Code, and shall include thereon a statement of the
prior calendar year's gross wind energy earnings, gross solar energy earn-
ings, or gross geothermal energy earnings.
(2) Upon examining and verifying said statement, the state tax commis-
sion shall compute the amount of the wind energy tax, solar energy tax, or the
geothermal energy tax based on the gross wind energy earnings, gross solar
energy earnings, or the gross geothermal energy earnings and shall allot to
each county in which the property of such producer is situated, and otherwise
exempted from taxation by section 63-602JJ, Idaho Code, either: that pro-
portion of the total wind energy tax, that proportion of the total solar en-
ergy tax, or that proportion of the total geothermal energy tax of such pro-
ducer shown to be due as the same proportion that the total original cost of
property situated in such county, and otherwise exempted from taxation by
section 63-602JJ, Idaho Code, bears to the total original cost of such prop-
erty of such producer for the wind energy project, of such producer for the
solar energy project, or of such producer for the geothermal energy project.
(3) The state tax commission shall then, for each county, apportion the
wind energy tax, solar energy tax, or geothermal energy tax so allotted to
such county among the several taxing units thereof within which any property
of such producer is situated, and otherwise exempted from taxation by sec-
tion 63-602JJ, Idaho Code, by apportioning to each such taxing unit that pro-
portion of the wind energy tax, solar energy tax, or geothermal energy tax so
allotted to such county. For such apportionment, the state tax commission
shall calculate:
(a) Calculate the weighted original cost which shall be the product of
the original cost of such property within such taxing unit times such


taxing unit's property tax levy rate for the prior year and; provided
that if a taxing unit that is a school district did not impose a supple-
mental levy pursuant to section 33-802, Idaho Code, in the prior year,
the state tax commission shall calculate the weighted original cost for
such school district using the greater of such school district's prop-
erty tax levy rate for the prior year or the property tax levy rate of the
county in which such property is situated for the prior year;
(b) Calculate the weighted apportionment rate which shall be the ratio
of the wind energy tax, of the solar energy tax, or of the geothermal en-
ergy tax, as the case may be, allotted to such county, to the aggregate
weighted original cost for all such taxing units within which the prop-
erty is located and then shall calculate; and
(c) Calculate the apportionment of the wind energy tax, solar energy
tax, or geothermal energy tax for each such taxing unit to be equal to
the product of the weighted original cost times the weighted apportion-
ment rate.
(4) The state tax commission shall, on or before the third Monday in
May, notify the state superintendent of public instruction, the county au-
ditor, and the county treasurer of such allotment and apportionment and the
amounts thereof.
(5) On or before the first Monday in August, the county auditor shall
notify the appropriate taxing units of the amount of wind energy tax, the
amount of solar energy tax, or the amount of the geothermal energy tax be-
ing apportioned and the amount of the solar energy tax distributed to each of
these taxing units during the twelve (12) months immediately preceding July
1 of the current tax year.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval, and retroactively to January 1, 2026.